Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-6,133
Overtaking and passing rules; vehicles
proceeding in same direction.

Except when overtaking and
passing on the right is permitted, the following rules shall govern the overtaking
and passing of vehicles proceeding in the same direction:

(1) The driver of a vehicle overtaking another vehicle proceeding in
the same direction shall first give a visible signal of his or her intention
and shall pass to the left of the other vehicle at a safe distance and shall
not again drive to the right side of the roadway until safely clear of the
overtaken vehicle;

(2) The driver of an overtaken vehicle shall give way to the right in
favor of the overtaking vehicle and shall not increase the speed of his or
her vehicle until completely passed by the overtaking vehicle; and

(3) The driver of a vehicle
overtaking a bicycle or electric personal assistive mobility device proceeding
in the same direction shall exercise due care, which shall include, but not
be limited to, leaving a safe distance of no less than three feet clearance,
when applicable, when passing a bicycle or electric personal assistive mobility
device and shall maintain such clearance until safely past the overtaken bicycle
or electric personal assistive mobility device.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 22;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-622;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 229;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 1361, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB1030, § 2.
July 19, 2012